Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.290

Additional powers—Auditoriums, art museums.

Every city of the first class may lease, purchase, or construct, and maintain public auditoriums and art museums and may use and let them for such public and private purposes for such compensation and rental and upon such conditions as shall be prescribed by ordinance; it may issue negotiable bonds for the purchase and construction thereof on such conditions and in such manner as shall be prescribed by its charter and by general law for the borrowing of money for corporate purposes.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.22.290. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 81 s 1; 1923 c 179 s 1; RRS s 8981-2.]